Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-407.23
Company; when subject to law.

(1) After August 24, 1979, any company may file with the Department
of Insurance a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions
of sections 44-403, 44-407.08
to 44-407.23, and 44-8907 after
a specified date before the second anniversary of August 24, 1979. After the
filing of such notice, such specified date shall be the operative date of
this act for such company. Annuity contracts thereafter issued by such company
shall comply with such sections. If a company makes no such election, the
operative date of this act for such company shall be the second anniversary
of August 24, 1979.

(2) After July 16, 2004, a company may elect to apply sections 44-407.08
to 44-407.23 to annuity contracts on a contract-form-by-contract-form basis
before the second anniversary of July 16, 2004. In all other instances, sections
44-407.08 to 44-407.23 shall become operative with respect to annuity contracts
issued by the company after the second anniversary of July 16, 2004.

(3) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out sections 44-407.10 to 44-407.23.

Laws 1979, LB 354, § 19;

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB755, § 14.